Illinois, session 104th, HB560.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Information Collection Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 707/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Grant 8Information Collection Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-589, eff. 1-1-14.)